Mississippi statutes. Title 45. Public Safety and Good Order
Chapter 33. Registration of Sex Offenders
§ 45-33-33.
Failure to register; reregister or comply with electronic monitoring; violations of chapter; penalties and enforcement.

The failure of an offender to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station or to provide any registration or other information, including, but not limited to, initial registration, reregistration, change of address information, change of employment, change of name, required notification to a volunteer organization or any other registration duty or submission of information required by this chapter is a violation of this chapter. Additionally, forgery of information or submission of information under false pretenses, whether by the registrant or another person, is also a violation of this chapter.

A person commits a violation of this chapter who:

Knowingly harbors, or knowingly attempts to harbor, or knowingly assists another person in harboring or attempting to harbor a sex offender who is in violation of this chapter; or

Knowingly assists a sex offender in eluding a law enforcement agency that is seeking to find the sex offender to question the sex offender about, or to arrest the sex offender for, noncompliance with the requirements of this chapter; or

Provides information to a law enforcement agency regarding a sex offender which the person knows to be false.

A registrant who is required to submit to electronic monitoring who does not comply with all the terms and conditions of the electronic monitoring commits a violation of this chapter.

Unless otherwise specified, a violation of this chapter shall be considered a felony and shall be punishable by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment in the custody of the Department of Corrections for not more than five (5) years, or both fine and imprisonment.

A person who is required to register under this chapter who is subsequently convicted for a registration violation under this section, upon release from incarceration, shall submit to mandatory electronic monitoring under the program established under Section 45-33-45 for a period computed by subtracting the time the person spent in actual incarceration from the five-year maximum imprisonment for the offense and the period of post-release monitoring shall not be suspended or reduced by the court or the Department of Corrections.

Whenever it appears that an offender has failed to comply with the duty to register, reregister or submit to electronic monitoring, the department shall promptly notify the sheriff of the county of the last-known address of the offender as well as the sheriff of the county of the last-known location of the offender, if different. Upon notification, the sheriff shall attempt to locate the offender at his last-known address or last-known location.

If the sheriff locates the offender, he shall enforce the provisions of this chapter, including initiation of prosecution if appropriate. The sheriff shall then notify the department with the current information regarding the offender.

If the sheriff is unable to locate the offender, the sheriff shall promptly notify the department and initiate a criminal prosecution against the offender for the failure to register, reregister or comply with electronic monitoring. The sheriff shall make the appropriate transactions into the Federal Bureau of Investigation’s wanted-person database and issue a warrant for the offender’s arrest. The department shall notify the United States Marshals Service of the offender’s noncompliant status and shall update the registry database and website to show the defendant’s noncompliant status as an absconder.

A violation of this chapter shall result in the arrest of the offender.

Any prosecution for a violation of this section shall be brought by a prosecutor in the county of the violation.

A person required to register under this chapter who commits any act or omission in violation of this chapter may be prosecuted for the act or omission in the county in which the act or omission was committed, the county of the last registered address of the sex offender, the county in which the conviction occurred for the offense or offenses that meet the criteria requiring the person to register, the county in which he was designated a sex offender, or the county in which the sex offender was found.

The Commissioner of Public Safety or his authorized agent shall suspend the driver’s license or driving privilege of any offender failing to comply with the duty to report, register or reregister, submit to monitoring, or who has provided false information.

When a person required to register under this chapter is accused of any registration offense under this section, pretrial release on bond shall be conditioned on the offender’s submission to electronic monitoring under the program established under Section 45-33-45.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 7; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 6; Laws, 2004, ch. 493, § 2; Laws, 2005, ch. 353, § 4; Laws, 2006, ch. 566, § 3; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 6; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 7; Laws, 2013, ch. 521, § 6, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2014.

§ 45-33-34.
Notification to the Department of Public Safety regarding reincarceration or commitment of registered sex offender.

The Department of Corrections and all law enforcement agencies shall notify the department when a registered sex offender is arrested or incarcerated for another offense or as the result of having violated probation, parole, conditional discharge or other sentence or court order.

The offender, offender’s guardian, offender’s conservator or the administrator of the institution shall notify the department when a registered sex offender is committed to a mental institution for a reason other than the initial confinement following an acquittal by reason of insanity for a sex offense.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 563, § 5; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 45-33-35.
Central registry of offenders; duties of agencies to provide information.

The Mississippi Department of Public Safety shall maintain a central registry of sex offender information as defined in Section 45-33-25 and shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out this section. The responsible agencies shall provide the information required in Section 45-33-25 on a form developed by the department to ensure accurate information is maintained.

Upon conviction, adjudication or acquittal by reason of insanity of any sex offender, if the sex offender is not immediately confined or not sentenced to a term of imprisonment, the clerk of the court which convicted and sentenced the sex offender shall inform the person of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the department.

Before release from prison or placement on parole, supervised release or in a work center or restitution center, the Department of Corrections shall inform the person of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the Department of Public Safety.

Before release from a community regional mental health center or from confinement in a mental institution following an acquittal by reason of insanity, the director of the facility shall inform the offender of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the Department of Public Safety.

Before release from a youthful offender facility, the director of the facility shall inform the person of the duty to register, including the duty to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station, and shall perform the registration duties as described in Section 45-33-23 and forward the information to the Department of Public Safety.

In addition to performing the registration duties, the responsible agency shall:

Inform the person having a duty to register that:

The person is required to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station at least ten (10) days before changing address.

Any change of address to another jurisdiction shall be reported to the department by personally appearing at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station not less than ten (10) days before the change of address. The offender shall comply with any registration requirement in the new jurisdiction.

The person must register in any jurisdiction where the person is employed, carries on a vocation, is stationed in the military or is a student.

Address verifications shall be made by personally appearing at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within the required time period.

Notification or verification of a change in status of a registrant’s enrollment, employment or vocation at any public or private educational institution, including any secondary school, trade or professional institution, or institution of higher education shall be reported to the department by personally appearing at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within three (3) business days of the change.

If the person has been convicted of a sex offense, the person shall notify any organization for which the person volunteers in which volunteers have direct, private or unsupervised contact with minors that the person has been convicted of a sex offense as provided in Section 45-33-32(1).

Upon any change of name or employment, a registrant is required to personally appear at a Department of Public Safety Driver’s License Station within three (3) business days of the change.

Upon any change of vehicle information, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change.

Upon any change of e-mail address or addresses, instant message address or addresses or any other designation used in Internet communications, postings or telephone communications, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change.

Upon any change of information deemed to be necessary to the state’s policy to assist local law enforcement agencies’ efforts to protect their communities, a registrant is required to report the change on an appropriate form supplied by the department within three (3) business days of the change.

Require the person to read and sign a form stating that the duty of the person to register under this chapter has been explained.

Obtain or facilitate the obtaining of a biological sample from every registrant as required by this chapter if such biological sample has not already been provided to the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory.

Provide a copy of the order of conviction or sentencing order to the department at the time of registration.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 8; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 7; Laws, 2004, ch. 493, § 3; Laws, 2005, ch. 353, § 5; Laws, 2006, ch. 563, § 6; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 8; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 8; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 45-33-36.
Duty of Department of Public Safety to provide sex offender registration information; notification to residents.

Upon receipt of sex offender registration or change of registration information, the Department of Public Safety shall immediately provide the information to:

The National Sex Offender Registry or other appropriate databases;

The sheriff of the county and the chief law enforcement officer of any other jurisdiction where the offender resides, lodges, is an employee or is a student or intends to reside, work, attend school or volunteer;

The sheriff of the county and the chief law enforcement officer of any other jurisdiction from which or to which a change of residence, employment or student status occurs;

The Department of Human Services and any other social service entities responsible for protecting minors in the child welfare system;

The probation agency that is currently supervising the sex offender;

Any agency responsible for conducting employment-related background checks under Section 3 of the National Child Protection Act of 1993 (42 USC 5119(a));

Each school and public housing agency in each jurisdiction in which the sex offender resides, is an employee or is a student;

All prosecutor offices in each jurisdiction in which the sex offender resides, is an employee, or is a student; and

Any other agencies with criminal investigation, prosecution or sex offender supervision functions in each jurisdiction in which the sex offender resides, is an employee, or is a student.

The Department of Public Safety shall post changes to the public registry website within three (3) business days. Electronic notification will be available via the Internet to all law enforcement agencies, to any volunteer organizations in which contact with minors or vulnerable adults might occur and any organization, company or individual who requests notification pursuant to procedures established by the Department of Public Safety. This provision shall take effect upon the state’s receipt and implementation of the Department of Justice software in compliance with the provisions of the Adam Walsh Act.

From and after July 1, 2015, local jurisdictions receiving notification and that have the ability may notify residents when a sex offender begins residing, lodges, becomes employed, volunteers or attends school or intends to reside, lodge, work, attend school or volunteer in the area by using a website, social media, print media, e-mail or may provide a link to the Department of Public Safety website.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 17; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 9; Laws, 2013, ch. 521, § 7, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2014.

§ 45-33-37.
DNA identification system; convicted sex offender to submit biological sample for purposes of DNA identification analysis.

The Mississippi Forensics Laboratory shall develop a plan for and establish a deoxyribonucleic acid (DNA) identification system. In implementing the plan, the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory shall purchase the appropriate equipment. The DNA identification system as established herein shall be compatible with that utilized by the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

From and after January 1, 1996, every individual convicted of a sex offense or in the custody of the Mississippi Department of Corrections for a sex offense as defined in Section 45-33-23 shall submit a biological sample for purposes of DNA identification analysis before release from or transfer to a state correctional facility or county jail or other detention facility.

From and after January 1, 1996, any person having a duty to register under Section 45-33-25 for whom a DNA analysis is not already on file shall submit a biological sample for purposes of DNA identification analysis within five (5) working days after registration.

The Mississippi Forensics Laboratory shall be responsible for the policy management and administration of the state DNA identification record system to support law enforcement and other criminal justice agencies and shall:

Promulgate rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this section; and

Provide for cooperation with the Federal Bureau of Investigation and other criminal justice agencies relating to the state’s participation in the Combined DNA Index System (CODIS) program and the national DNA identification index or in any DNA database designated by the Forensics Laboratory.

A DNA sample obtained in good faith shall be deemed to have been obtained in accordance with the requirements of this section. Any entry into the database which is found to be erroneous shall not prohibit law enforcement officials from the legitimate use of information in the furtherance of a criminal investigation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 9; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 8; Laws, 2006, ch. 563, § 7; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 45-33-39.
Notification to defendant charged with sex offense; notice included on any guilty plea form and judgement and sentence forms.

The court shall provide written notification to any defendant charged with a sex offense as defined by this chapter of the registration requirements of Sections 45-33-25 and 45-33-31. Such notice shall be included on any guilty plea forms and judgment and sentence forms provided to the defendant. The court shall obtain a written acknowledgment of receipt on each occasion.

A court imposing a sentence, disposition or order of commitment following acquittal by reason of insanity shall notify the offender of the registration requirements of Sections 45-33-25 and 45-33-31. The court shall obtain a written acknowledgment of receipt on each occasion.

A court having jurisdiction of any of the offenses enumerated in Section 45-33-23(h) shall cause to be forwarded to the Department of Public Safety a certified record of conviction in such court of any person of any of the offenses listed.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 10; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 45-33-41.
Notification to inmates and offenders by Department of Corrections, county or municipal jails, and juvenile detention facilities; victim notification.

The Department of Corrections or any person having charge of a county or municipal jail or any juvenile detention facility shall provide written notification to an inmate or offender in the custody of the jail or other facility due to a conviction of or adjudication for a sex offense of the registration and notification requirements of Sections 45-33-25, 45-33-31, 45-33-32 and 45-33-59 at the time of the inmate’s or offender’s confinement and release from confinement, and shall receive a signed acknowledgment of receipt on both occasions.

At least fifteen (15) days prior to the inmate’s release from confinement, the Department of Corrections shall notify the victim of the offense or a designee of the immediate family of the victim regarding the date when the offender’s release shall occur, provided a current address of the victim or designated family member has been furnished in writing to the Director of Records for such purpose.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 11; Laws, 2004, ch. 493, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 9; Laws, 2014, ch. 457, § 77, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 45-33-43.
Written notification to applicants for certain driver’s licenses; written acknowledgment by applicant of receipt of notification.

At the time a person surrenders a driver’s license from another jurisdiction or makes an application for a driver’s license, temporary driving permit, intermediate license, commercial driver’s license or identification card issued under Section 45-35-3, the department shall provide the applicant with written information on the registration requirements of this chapter and shall require written acknowledgment by the applicant of receipt of the notification.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 12; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 45-33-45.
Data monitoring and alert system for certain persons required to be monitored.

The Department of Corrections may enter into a contract with a qualified vendor experienced in and capable of fulfilling the requirements of this section on a daily basis to provide a data monitoring and alert system for persons who are required to be monitored under this chapter. The initial program shall provide for monitoring upon release of the offenders listed in Section 45-33-33 or 45-33-47 as being obligated to be monitored while on bond or upon release from confinement.

The system shall monitor the movement of a monitored subject through public records or other record information systems, and, at a minimum, shall provide:

Time-correlated or continuous tracking of the geographic location of the monitored subject using a Global Positioning System that is based on satellite and other location technology;

An automated monitoring system that can be used to permit law enforcement agencies to compare the geographic positions of monitored subjects with reported crime incidents and the proximity of the monitored subject to a reported crime incident; and

From and after January 1, 2015, and subject to regulations promulgated by the Commissioner of Corrections, notification to:

A victim or family of a victim who have registered for notification when the offender is within a specified range of the victim’s or family’s residence; and

Law enforcement when an offender is within the prohibited range of a school or other place where the offender is prohibited from being.

The vendor shall notify the Department of Public Safety or a local law enforcement agency if a registered sex offender does any of the following:

Moves from a residence or address in this state to a residence or address in another state.

Moves from a residence or address in this state to another residence or address in this state.

The Department of Corrections shall develop procedures to determine, investigate and report on a twenty-four-hour-per-day basis a monitored subject’s noncompliance with the terms and conditions of the program, and all reports of noncompliance shall be investigated immediately by the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction that receives a report of noncompliance.

The system shall be installed and operational not later than January 1, 2014, following an appropriate testing period. The initial program shall consist of monitoring of the required offenders; in the second phase, the program will provide for notification to victims who have registered for notification.

The Commissioner of Corrections shall study and develop recommendations for the Legislature as to the advisability of monitoring of additional registrants not later than January 1, 2015.

The Commissioner of Corrections may adopt regulations to establish fees and otherwise administer monitoring of sex offenders as required under this chapter.

Notwithstanding any provision of law, rule or regulation to the contrary, the Department of Corrections, Attorney General, Department of Public Safety, Mississippi Bureau of Investigation, and federal, county and municipal law enforcement agencies may share criminal incident information with each other and the vendor selected to provide the monitoring equipment for the program for the purposes of detection and prevention of crime.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2013, ch. 521, § 4, eff from and after January 1, 2014.

§ 45-33-47.
Petition for relief from duty to register; grounds; minimum period of continuing registration based on three-tier classification of offenses;
certain offenders subject to lifetime registration; certain offenders subject to electronic monitoring.

A sex offender with a duty to register under Section 45-33-25 shall only be relieved of the duty under subsection (2) of this section.

A person required to register for a registrable sex offense under Section 45-33-25 may petition the circuit court of the sentencing jurisdiction, or for a person whose duty to register arose in another jurisdiction, the county in which the registrant resides, to be relieved of that duty under the following conditions:

The offender has maintained his registration in Mississippi for the required minimum registration from the most recent date of occurrence of at least one (1) of the following: release from prison, placement on parole, supervised release or probation or as determined by the offender’s tier classification. Incarceration for any offense will restart the minimum registration requirement. Registration in any other jurisdiction does not reduce the minimum time requirement for maintaining registration in Mississippi.

Tier One.—

1. Section 97-5-27(1) relatingto dissemination of sexually oriented material to children;

2. Section 97-29-61(2) relatingto voyeurism when the victim is a child under sixteen (16) years ofage;

3. Section 97-29-3 relatingto misdemeanor sexual intercourse between teacher and student;

4. Section 97-29-45(1)(a) relatingto obscene electronic communication;

5. Any convictionof conspiracy to commit, accessory to commission, or attempt tocommit any offense listed in this tier;

6. Any convictionfor violation of a similar law of another jurisdiction of any offenselisted in this tier;

7. Any offense resultingin a conviction in another jurisdiction for which registration isrequired in the jurisdiction where the conviction was had, althoughregistration would not be otherwise required in this state.

Tier One requiresregistration for a minimum of fifteen (15) years in this state andincludes any of the following listed registrable sex offenses:

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an offender may petition the appropriate circuit court to be relieved of the duty to registeruponfifteen (15) years’ satisfaction of the requirementsof thissection for the convictions classified as Tier One offenses.

Tier Two.—

1. Section 97-5-33(3) through(9) relating to the exploitation of children;

2. Section 97-29-59 relatingto unnatural intercourse;

3. Section 97-29-63, relatingto filming another without permission where there is an expectationof privacy;

4. Section 97-3-104 relatingto crime of sexual activity between law enforcement or correctionalpersonnel and prisoners;

5. Section 43-47-18(2)(a) and(b) relating to gratification of lust or fondling by health care employeesor persons in position of trust or authority;

6. Any convictionof conspiracy to commit, accessory to commission, or attempt to commitany offense listed in this tier;

7. Any convictionfor violation of a similar law of another jurisdiction of any offenselisted in this tier; or

8. Any convictionof a Tier One offense if it is the offender’s second or subsequentconviction of a registrable sex offense;

Tier Tworequires registration for a minimum of twenty-five (25) years in thisstate and includes any of the following listed registrable sex offenses:

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, an offender may petition the appropriate circuit court to be relieved of the duty to register upon twenty-five (25) years’ satisfaction of the requirements of this section for the convictions classified as Tier Two offenses.

Tier Three.— Tier Three requires lifetime registration, the registrant not being eligible to be relieved of the duty to register except as otherwise provided in this section, and includes any of the following listed registrable sex offenses:

Section 97-3-65 relating to rape;

Section 97-3-71 relating to rape and assault with intent to ravish;

Section 97-3-95 relating to sexual battery;

Subsection (1) or (2) of Section 97-5-33 relating to the exploitation of children;

Section 97-5-5 relating to enticing a child for concealment, prostitution or marriage;

Section 97-5-41 relating to the carnal knowledge of a stepchild, adopted child or child of a cohabiting partner;

Section 97-3-53 relating to kidnapping if the victim is under the age of eighteen (18);

Section 97-3-54.1(1)(c) relating to procuring sexual servitude of a minor;

Section 97-3-54.3 relating to aiding, abetting or conspiring to violate antihuman trafficking provisions;

Section 97-5-23 relating to the touching of a child, mentally defective or incapacitated person or physically helpless person for lustful purposes;

Section 43-47-18 relating to sexual abuse of a vulnerable person by health care employees or persons in a position of trust or authority;

Section 97-5-39(1)(c) relating to contributing to the neglect or delinquency of a child, felonious abuse and/or battery of a child, if the victim was sexually abused;

Capital murder when one (1) of the above described offenses is the underlying crime;

Any conviction for violation of a similar law of another jurisdiction or designation as a sexual predator in another jurisdiction;

Any conviction of conspiracy to commit, accessory to commission, or attempt to commit any offense listed in this tier; or

Any conviction of a Tier Two offense if it is the offender’s second or subsequent conviction of a registrable sex offense.

An offender who has two (2) separate convictions for any of the registrable offenses described in Section 45-33-23 is subject to lifetime registration and shall not be eligible to petition to be relieved of the duty to register if at least one (1) of the convictions was entered on or after July 1, 1995.

An offender, twenty-one (21) years of age or older, who is convicted of any sex offense where the victim was fourteen (14) years of age or younger shall be subject to lifetime registration and shall not be relieved of the duty to register.

A first-time offender fourteen (14) years of age or older adjudicated delinquent in a youth court for a registrable offense of rape pursuant to Section 96-3-65 or a registrable offense of sexual battery pursuant to Section 97-3-95 is subject to lifetime registration, but shall be eligible to petition to be relieved of the duty to register after twenty-five (25) years of registration.

Registration following arrest or arraignment for failure to register is not a defense and does not relieve the sex offender of criminal liability for failure to register.

The department shall continue to list in the registry the name and registration information of all registrants who no longer work, reside or attend school in this state even after the registrant moves to another jurisdiction and registers in the new jurisdiction as required by law. The registry shall note that the registrant moved out of state.

In determining whether to release an offender from the obligation to register, the court shall consider the nature of the registrable offense committed and the criminal and relevant noncriminal behavior of the petitioner both before and after conviction. The court may relieve the offender of the duty to register only if the petitioner shows, by clear and convincing evidence, that the registrant properly maintained his registration as required by law and that future registration of the petitioner will not serve the purposes of this chapter and the court is otherwise satisfied that the petitioner is not a current or potential threat to public safety. The district attorney in the circuit in which the petition is filed must be given notice of the petition at least three (3) weeks before the hearing on the matter. The district attorney may present evidence in opposition to the requested relief or may otherwise demonstrate the reasons why the petition should be denied. If the court denies the petition, the petitioner may not again petition the court for relief until one (1) year has elapsed unless the court orders otherwise in its order of denial of relief.

The offender will be required to continue registration for any sex offense conviction unless the conviction is set aside in any post-conviction proceeding, the offender receives a pardon, the charge is dismissed or the offender has received a court order pursuant to this section relieving him of the duty to register. Upon submission of the appropriate documentation to the department of one (1) of these occurrences, registration duties will be discontinued.

A person required to register as a sex offender who is convicted under Section 45-33-33 of providing false registration information or of failure to register, reregister, update registration, or comply with electronic monitoring shall be subject to electronic monitoring at the expense of the offender under the program provided in Section 45-33-45. Termination of the duty to register also terminates the duty to be monitored.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 14; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 10; Laws, 2006, ch. 566, § 4; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 11; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 11; Laws, 2013, ch. 521, § 3, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2014.

§ 45-33-49.
Disclosure to public; guidelines for sheriffs as to notification; certain registry information to be available online; participation in Dru Sjodin National Sex Offender Public website; notification of schools and day care centers.

Records maintained pursuant to this chapter shall be open to law enforcement agencies which shall be authorized to release relevant and necessary information regarding sex offenders to the public.

The identity of a victim of an offense that requires registration under this chapter shall not be released.

A sheriff shall maintain records for registrants of the county and shall make available to any person upon request the name, address, place of employment, crime for which convicted, date and place of conviction of any registrant, and any other information deemed necessary for the protection of the public. The sheriffs shall be responsible for verifying their respective registries annually against the department’s records to ensure current information is available at both levels.

Upon written request, the department shall provide to any person the name, address, photograph, if available, date of photograph, place of employment, crime for which convicted, date and place of conviction of any registrant, hair, eye color, height, race, sex and date of birth of any registrant, and any other information deemed necessary for the protection of the public.

The Department of Public Safety shall maintain an Internet website in a manner that will permit the public to obtain relevant information for each sex offender in the registry as required in this subsection (4). The website shall permit the public to obtain relevant information for each offender by a single query for any given name, zip code, municipality, county or geographic radius set by the user.

The Department of Public Safety shall participate in the Dru Sjodin National Sex Offender Public website. The information required to be displayed on the public registry website includes the offender’s name and all known aliases; a current photograph; a physical description; the offender’s residential addresses including the offender’s permanent address and any address at which the offender habitually lives; employer address; school address; the current sex offense for which the offender is registered; criminal history of any other sex offenses for which the offender has been convicted; a description of the offender’s vehicle including license tag number; and the offender’s status if designated as noncompliant or an absconder because of failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter.

The public website shall not display the identity of a victim of an offense that requires registration under this chapter or the registered sex offender’s social security number, travel or immigration document numbers, Internet identifiers, telephone numbers, or any arrests not resulting in conviction.

The Department of Education, the Mississippi Private School Association and the Department of Health shall notify all schools and licensed day care centers annually regarding the availability upon request of this information.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent law enforcement officers from notifying members of the public exposed to danger of any circumstances or individuals that pose a danger under circumstances that are not enumerated in this section.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prevent law enforcement officers from providing community notification of any circumstances or individuals that pose or could pose a danger under circumstances that are not enumerated in this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 15; Laws, 2001, ch. 500, § 11; Laws, 2011, ch. 359, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2011.

§ 45-33-51.
Misuse of information; penalties.

Any person who willfully misuses or alters public record information relating to a sex offender or sexual predator, or a person residing or working at an address reported by a sex offender, including information displayed by law enforcement agencies on web sites, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or both.

The sale or exchange of sex offender information for profit is prohibited. Any violation of this subsection (2) is a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or imprisonment in the county jail not more than six (6) months, or both.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 16; Laws, 2007, ch. 392, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2007.

§ 45-33-53.
Immunity from civil liability; immunity for exercise of discretion under chapter.

An elected public official, public employee, or public agency is immune from civil liability for damages for any discretionary decision to release relevant and necessary information unless it is shown that the official, employee, or agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity provided under this section applies to the release of relevant information to other employees or officials or to the general public.

Nothing in this chapter shall be deemed to impose any liability upon or to give rise to a cause of action against any public official, public employee, or public agency for failing to release information as authorized in this section.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any person who provides or fails to provide information relevant to the procedures set forth in this chapter shall not be liable therefor in any civil or criminal action. Nothing herein shall be deemed to grant any such immunity to any person for his willful or wanton act of commission or omission.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 17, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 45-33-55.
Exemptions for expunction.

Except for juvenile criminal history information that has been sealed by order of the court, this chapter exempts sex offenses from laws of this state or court orders authorizing the destroying, expunging, purging or sealing of criminal history records to the extent such information is authorized for dissemination under this chapter.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2000.

§ 45-33-57.
Fees.

The Department of Public Safety may adopt regulations to establish fees to be charged for information requests under this chapter.

The Department of Public Safety may adopt regulations to establish fees to be charged to registrants for registration, reregistration, and verification or change of address.

Regulations promulgated under this section shall be duly filed with the Secretary of State under the Administrative Procedures Act.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2000, ch. 499, § 19; Laws, 2005, ch. 353, § 6; Laws, 2014, ch. 424, § 2, eff from and after Oct. 1, 2014.